Wyoming, session 2026, HB0104.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 18-3-403 is created to read:

18-3-403. County clerks; rejection or notation of
frivolous filings.

(a) As used in this section:
HB0104

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0406

(i) "Filing" means any document submitted by the
public for filing or recording with the county clerk except
for conveyances as defined by W.S. 34-1-102, any document
created or received according to the county clerk's duties
under W.S. 18-3-402(a)(i) and liens;

(ii) "Frivolous" means lacking an arguable basis
in law or in fact or being presented for any improper
purpose, including harassment.

(b) A county clerk may reject any frivolous filing
that a person seeks to file with the clerk, in accordance
with the following:

(i) If the clerk determines that the filing may
be frivolous, the clerk may decline to file the filing and
may hold the filing in abeyance, subject to this
subsection;

(ii) For any filing that the clerk declines to
file or holds in abeyance in accordance with this
subsection, the clerk shall file a motion with the district
HB0104

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0406
court in the county for an order that the filing is
frivolous. The person seeking to file the filing shall be
given notice and an opportunity to be heard before the
district court acts on the motion;

(iii) If the district court determines that the
filing is frivolous, the court may enter an order declaring
the filing frivolous, after which the clerk may reject the
filing;

(iv) For any filing rejected under this
subsection, the clerk shall refund any fee received from
the person seeking to file the filing within ten (10) days
of the district court's order;

(v) No filing shall be rejected under this
subsection if the clerk has deposited any fee received for
the filing or if the clerk has filed the filing.

(c) A county clerk may seek to notate any filing
previously filed with the clerk in accordance with the
following:

HB0104

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0406
(i) The clerk may review any previously filed
filings to determine if a filing is frivolous;

(ii) Upon identifying a previously filed filing
that the clerk believes may be frivolous, the clerk may
file a motion with the district court in the county for an
order that the filing is frivolous. The person who
submitted the filing to the clerk shall be given notice and
an opportunity to be heard before the district court acts
on the motion;

(iii) If the district court determines that the
previously filed filing is frivolous, the court may enter
an order declaring the filing frivolous;

(iv) Upon the entry of an order under paragraph
(iii) of this subsection, the clerk may include a notation
with the filing stating that the filing has been deemed
frivolous.

(d) Any filing declared frivolous by a district court
under this section shall have no legal effect.

HB0104

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0406
Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2026.

(END)
HB0104